Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1709
Fixed asset, defined.

Fixed asset shall mean assets as prescribed in generally accepted accounting principles.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 9;

Laws 2017, LB375, § 3.